North Carolina, session 2025, SB556.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-166.4(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Buffer Zone. – No person or group of persons shall hinder access, harass others,
distribute campaign literature, place political advertising, solicit votes, or otherwise engage in
election-related activity in the voting place or in a buffer zone which shall be prescribed by the
county board of elections around the voting place. In determining the dimensions of that buffer
zone for each voting place, the county board of elections shall, where practical, set the limit at
50 100 feet from the door of entrance to the voting place, measured when that door is closed, but
in no event shall it set the limit at more than 50 100 feet or at less than 25 75 feet."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to
election-related activity in a buffer zone of a voting place on or after that date.
*S556-v-1*